Utah statutes.
58-41-6.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Speech-language Pathologist and Audiologist Licensing Board, consisting of four speech-language pathologists or audiologists and one member of the general public.

(a)  The nonpublic members of the board shall be licensed to provide and shall be engaged in providing speech-language pathology or audiology services to the public as a major interest as follows:

(i)  one member shall be in private practice as a primary professional interest and activity or shall be a provider or speech-language pathology or audiology services at large;

(ii)  one member shall be from a nonschool clinic setting which provides ongoing speech-language pathology or audiology services;

(iii)  one member shall be a provider of speech-language pathology and audiology services in the elementary or secondary schools; and

(iv)  one member shall be a provider of a speech-language pathology and audiology college or university training program.

(b)  At no time may the board consist of more than two members who represent speech-language pathology or more than two members who represent audiology.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

